Washington statutes.
RCW 11.106.100

Waiver of accounting by beneficiary.

Any adult beneficiary entitled to an accounting under either RCW 11.106.020 or 11.106.030 may waive such an accounting by a separate instrument delivered to the trustee.

[ 1985 c 30 s 104. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 137; 1955 c 33 s 30.30.100; prior: 1951 c 226 s 11. Formerly RCW 30.30.100.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.